Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2189.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 3(d), 4(a) and (e) and 5(c) of the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, are amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 3(D) OF THE ACT OF JANUARY 17, 1968 (P.L.11, NO.5), KNOWN AS THE MINIMUM WAGE ACT OF 1968, IS AMENDED TO READ:Section 3. Definitions.--As used in this act:* * *(d) "Wages" mean compensation due to any employe by reason of his or her employment, payable in legal tender of the United <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021 States or checks on banks convertible into cash on demand at full face value, subject to such deductions, charges or allowances as may be permitted by regulations of the secretary under section 9."Wage" paid to any employe includes the reasonable cost, as determined by the secretary, to the employer for furnishing such employe with board, lodging, or other facilities, if such board, lodging, or other facilities are customarily furnished by such employer to his or her employes: Provided, That the cost of board, lodging, or other facilities shall not be included as a part of the wage paid to any employe to the extent it is excluded therefrom under the terms of a bona fide collective-bargaining agreement applicable to the particular employe: Provided, further, That the secretary is authorized to determine the fair value of such board, lodging, or other facilities for defined classes of employes and in defined areas, based on average cost to the employer or to groups of employers similarly situated, or average value to groups of employes, or other appropriate measures of fair value. Such evaluations, where applicable and pertinent, shall be used in lieu of actual measure of cost in determining the wage paid to any employe.In determining the hourly wage an employer is required to pay a tipped employe, the amount paid such employe by his or her employer shall be an amount equal to: (i) the cash wage paid the employe which for the purposes of the determination shall be not less than [the cash wage required to be paid the employe on the date immediately prior to the effective date of this subparagraph] sixty percent of the cash wage required to be paid the employe under section 4 of this act; and (ii) an additional amount on account of the tips received by the employe which is 20260HB2189PN3059 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equal to the difference between the wage specified in subparagraph (i) and the wage in effect under section 4 of this act. The additional amount on account of tips may not exceed the value of tips actually received by the employe. The previous sentence shall not apply with respect to any tipped employe unless:(1) Such employe has been informed by the employer of the provisions of this subsection;(2) All tips received by such employe have been retained by the employe and shall not be surrendered to the employer to be used as wages to satisfy the requirement to pay the current hourly minimum rate in effect; where the gratuity is added to the charge made by the establishment, either by the management, or by the customer, the gratuity shall become the property of the employe; except that this subsection shall not be construed to prohibit the pooling of tips among employes who customarily and regularly receive tips.* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 4(A) AND (E) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:Section 4. Minimum Wages.--Except as may otherwise be provided under this act:(a) Every employer shall pay to each of his or her employes wages for all hours worked at a rate of not less than:(1) Two dollars sixty-five cents ($2.65) an hour upon the effective date of this amendment.(2) Two dollars ninety cents ($2.90) an hour during the year beginning January 1, 1979.(3) Three dollars ten cents ($3.10) an hour during the year beginning January 1, 1980.20260HB2189PN3059 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Three dollars thirty-five cents ($3.35) an hour after December 31, 1980.(5) Three dollars seventy cents ($3.70) an hour beginning February 1, 1989.(6) Five dollars fifteen cents ($5.15) an hour beginning September 1, 1997.(7) Six dollars twenty-five cents ($6.25) an hour beginning January 1, 2007.(8) Seven dollars fifteen cents ($7.15) an hour beginning July 1, 2007.(9) Eleven dollars ($11) an hour beginning January 1, 2027.(10) Thirteen dollars ($13) an hour beginning January 1, 2028.(11) Fifteen dollars ($15) an hour beginning January 1, 2029.(12) Beginning January 1, 2030, and each January 1 thereafter, the minimum wage shall be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment calculated by the secretary using the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area. In calculating the adjustment, the secretary shall use the most recent twelve-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. At least sixty days prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, the percentage increase and the minimum wage amount, rounded to the nearest multiple of five cents (5¢), shall be determined by the secretary. The secretary shall, within ten days following the determination, transmit a notice of the determination to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next 20260HB2189PN3059 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.* * *(A.2) THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY TO COUNTIES: (1) BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026, A COUNTY MAY, IN ITS DISCRETION, BY ORDINANCE, PROVIDE THAT AN EMPLOYER SHALL PAY TO EACH OF THE EMPLOYER'S EMPLOYES WAGES FOR ALL HOURS WORKED AT A RATE GREATER THAN THE AMOUNT PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (A) BUT NOT GREATER THAN FIFTEEN DOLLARS ($15) PER HOUR.(2) A COUNTY SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF THE PASSAGE OF THE ORDINANCE THIRTY DAYS PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE ORDINANCE.(3) BEGINNING JANUARY 1 FOLLOWING THE PASSAGE OF THE ORDINANCE AND EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER, THE MINIMUM WAGE SHALL BE INCREASED BY AN ANNUAL COST-OF-LIVING ADJUSTMENT CALCULATED BY THE SECRETARY USING THE PERCENTAGE CHANGE IN THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS (CPI-U) FOR THE PENNSYLVANIA, NEW JERSEY, DELAWARE AND MARYLAND AREA. IN CALCULATING THE ADJUSTMENT, THE SECRETARY SHALL USE THE MOST RECENT TWELVE-MONTH PERIOD FOR WHICH FIGURES HAVE BEEN OFFICIALLY REPORTED BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, BUREAU OF LABOR STATISTICS. AT LEAST SIXTY DAYS PRIOR TO THE DATE THE ADJUSTMENT IS DUE TO TAKE EFFECT, THE PERCENTAGE INCREASE AND THE MINIMUM WAGE AMOUNT, ROUNDED TO THE NEAREST MULTIPLE OF FIVE CENTS (5¢), SHALL BE DETERMINED BY THE SECRETARY. THE SECRETARY SHALL, WITHIN TEN DAYS FOLLOWING THE DETERMINATION, TRANSMIT A NOTICE OF THE DETERMINATION TO THE COUNTY AND THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU FOR PUBLICATION IN THE NEXT AVAILABLE ISSUE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN.(4) AT NO TIME SHALL THE WAGE PROVIDED FOR UNDER THIS SECTION BE LESS THAN THE WAGE PROVIDED FOR UNDER SUBSECTION (A).20260HB2189PN3059 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(e) In lieu of the minimum wage prescribed in subsection (a) [and section 5(c)] and notwithstanding subsections (b) and (d), an employer may, during the first sixty calendar days when an employe under the age of twenty years is initially employed, pay the employe training wages at a rate of not less than the minimum wage set forth in section 6(a) of the Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 206(a)). A person employed at the training wage under this subsection shall be informed of the amount of the training wage and the right to receive the full minimum wage, or a higher wage, upon completion of the training period. No employer may take any action to displace existing employes, including partial displacements such as reduction in the hours, wages or employment benefits of existing employes, for purposes of hiring individuals at the training wage authorized by this subsection.SECTION 3. SECTION 5(C) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:Section 5. Exemptions.--* * *[(c) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 4(a)(7) and (8), an employer unless otherwise exempt from the minimum wage provisions of section 4(a)(6) whose employe complement is composed of the equivalent of ten or less full-time employes to be calculated on a forty-hour workweek shall pay:(i) Five dollars sixty-five cents ($5.65) an hour beginning January 1, 2007.(ii) Six dollars sixty-five cents ($6.65) an hour beginning July 1, 2007.(2) Such employer shall pay the full amount of the minimum wage under section 4(a)(8) beginning July 1, 2008.]Section 2 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2189PN3059 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930